Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
Primaries

118.105.
Nominations by political parties — Vacancy in candidacy — Replacement candidates — Exceptions — Ineligibility of Senior Status Special Judge.

Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section and in KRS

118.115

, every political party shall nominate all of its candidates for elective offices to be voted for at any regular election at a primary held as provided in this chapter, and the governing authority of any political party shall have no power to nominate any candidate for any elective office or to provide any method of nominating candidates for any elective office other than by a primary as provided in this chapter.

Any political organization not constituting a political party as defined in KRS

118.015

may make its nominations as provided in KRS

118.325

.

If a vacancy occurs in the nomination of an unopposed candidate or in a nomination made by the primary before the certification of candidates for the regular election made under KRS

118.215

, because of death, withdrawal, disqualification to hold the office sought, or severe disabling condition which arose after the nomination, the governing authority of the party may provide for filling the vacancy, but only following certification to the governing authority, by the Secretary of State, that a vacancy exists for a reason specified in this subsection. When such a nomination has been made, the certificate of nomination shall be signed by the chair and secretary of the governing authority of the party making it, and shall be filed in the same manner as certificates of nomination at a primary.

If a vacancy occurs in the nomination of an unopposed candidate or in a nomination made by the primary before the certification of candidates for the regular election, and if that party’s nominee was the only political party candidate for the office sought, the governing authority of each party may nominate a candidate for the regular election, provided that no person has sought that party’s nomination by filing a notification and declaration.

If a vacancy occurs in the nomination of a candidate under the conditions of subsection (3) or (4) of this section prior to September 15 preceding the day of the regular election, certificates of nomination for replacement candidates shall be filed in the same manner as provided in subsections (3) and (4) not later than 4 p.m. ten (10) days after the vacancy occurs, excluding weekends and legal holidays. If a vacancy occurs in the nomination of a candidate under the conditions of subsection (3) or (4) of this section on or after September 15 preceding the date of the regular election, certificates of nomination for replacement candidates shall be filed in the same manner as provided in subsections (3) and (4) not later than 4 p.m. five (5) days after the vacancy occurs, excluding weekends and legal holidays.

If a vacancy in candidacy described in subsection (5) of this section occurs later than the second Thursday preceding the date of the regular election, no certificates of nomination shall be filed and any candidate whose name does not appear on the ballot may seek election by write-in voting pursuant to KRS

117.265

.

This section does not apply to candidates for members of boards of education, or presidential electors, nor to candidates participating in nonpartisan elections. However, regardless of the number of days served by a judge acting as a Senior Status Special Judge, a judge who elected to retire as a Senior Status Special Judge in accordance with KRS

21.580

shall not become a candidate for any elected office during the five (5) year term prescribed in KRS

21.580

(1)(a)1.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 100; 1976, ch. 54, § 23, effective January 1, 1978; 1978, ch. 384, § 25, effective January 1, 1978; 1982, ch. 394, § 18, effective July 15, 1982; 1988, ch. 17, § 8, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 49, § 1, effective March 12, 1990; 1994, ch. 482, § 1, effective April 13, 1994; 1998, ch. 2, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 71, § 7, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 46, § 1, effective June 26, 2007; 2013, ch. 66, § 1, effective June 25, 2013; 2021 ch. 197, § 49, effective June 29, 2021.

118.110.
Candidate
who is defeated or who violates corrupt practice law in primary cannot have
name on regular election ballot — Exception as to defeat of judicial
candidates. [Repealed.]

118.115.
Nominations for unexpired terms — Grouping of candidates on ballot — Ineligibility of Senior Status Special Judge.

Except as provided in KRS 83A.045(2)(b) governing vacancies in candidacy, candidates for unexpired terms to be filled at a regular election shall be nominated at the primary next preceding the regular election, if the vacancy occurred not less than one hundred sixty (160) days before the primary.

If the vacancy occurred less than one hundred sixty (160) days before the primary, the nomination shall be made in a manner determined by the governing authority of the political party concerned as defined in KRS

118.015

. Certificates of nomination shall be filed as required with the Secretary of State or county clerk not later than the first Tuesday after the first Monday in June preceding the day fixed by law for the election.

If the vacancy occurs after the first Tuesday after the first Monday in June preceding the day fixed by law for the election, but not less than three (3) months before the regular election, the nomination shall be made in a manner determined by the governing authority of the political party concerned as defined in KRS

118.015

. Certificates of nomination shall be filed as required with the Secretary of State or county clerk not later than the second Tuesday in August preceding the regular election sought.

Independent, political organization, or political group candidates filing to fill a vacancy for an unexpired term shall be governed by KRS

118.375

.

In the preparation of ballots, candidates for full terms shall be grouped together, and candidates for unexpired terms shall be grouped together, under appropriate headings, so that the voter may easily distinguish the candidates for full terms from the candidates for unexpired terms.

A judge who elected to retire as a Senior Status Special Judge in accordance with KRS

21.580

shall not become a candidate or a nominee for any elected office during the five (5) year term prescribed in KRS

21.580

(1)(a)1., regardless of the number of days served by the judge acting as a Senior Status Special Judge.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 101; 1984, ch. 185, § 9, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 17, § 9, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 48, § 38, effective July 13, 1990; 2013, ch. 66, § 2, effective June 25, 2013; 2019 ch. 187, § 10, effective November 6, 2019; 2022 ch. 87, § 18, effective April 7, 2022.

118.120.
Where
and by whom certificates and petitions of nomination to be filed. [Repealed.]

118.125.
Procedure and form for candidate to get name on primary ballot — Form in which name may appear on ballot.

Except as provided in KRS

118.155

, any person who is qualified under the provisions of KRS

116.055

to vote in any primary for the candidates for nomination by the party at whose hands he or she seeks the nomination, shall have his or her name printed on the official ballot of his or her party for an office to which he is eligible in that primary, upon filing, with the Secretary of State or county clerk, as appropriate, at the proper time, a notification and declaration.

The notification and declaration shall be in the form prescribed by the State Board of Elections. It shall be signed by the candidate and by not less than two (2) registered voters of the same party from the district or jurisdiction from which the candidate seeks nomination. Signatures for nomination papers shall not be affixed on the document to be filed prior to the first Wednesday after the first Monday in November of the year preceding the year in which the office will appear on the ballot. The notification and declaration for a candidate shall include the following oath:

The declaration shall be subscribed and sworn to before an officer authorized to administer an oath by the candidate and by the two (2) voters making the declaration and signing the candidate’s petition for office.

When the notice and declaration has been filed with the Secretary of State or county clerk, as appropriate, and certified according to KRS

118.165

, the Secretary of State or county clerk, as appropriate, shall have the candidate’s name printed on the ballot according to the provisions of this chapter, except as provided in KRS

118.185

.

Titles, ranks, or spurious phrases shall not be accepted on the filing papers and shall not be printed on the ballots as part of the candidate’s name; however, nicknames, initials, and contractions of given names may be acceptable as the candidate’s name.

“For the purpose of having my name placed on the official primary election ballot as a candidate for nomination by the (name in full as desired on the ballot as provided in KRS

118.129

), do solemnly swear that my residence address is , that my mailing address, if different, is , and that I am a registered - precinct; that I believe in the principles of the , and intend to support its principles and policies; that I meet all the statutory and constitutional qualifications for the office which I am seeking; that if nominated as a candidate of such party at the ensuing election I will accept the nomination and not withdraw for reasons other than those stated in KRS 118.105(3); that I will not knowingly violate any election law or any law relating to corrupt and fraudulent practice in campaigns or elections in this state, and if finally elected I will qualify for the office.” Party, I, - - - - - - - - - - - - (street, route, highway, city if applicable, county, state, and zip code) (post office address) (party) voter in Party

Click to view

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 102; 1976, ch. 7, § 1; 1976, ch. 54, § 24, effective March 10, 1976; 1982, ch. 394, § 19, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 317, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 470, § 23, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 48, § 39, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 186, § 1, effective November 5, 1992; 1994, ch. 458, § 18, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 201, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 275, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2008, ch. 79, § 10, effective July 15, 2008; 2020 ch. 88, § 6, effective July 15, 2020.

118.126.
When candidate for Governor must designate running mate for Lieutenant Governor — Joint election of slate of candidates.

Each candidate for the office of Governor shall designate a candidate for Lieutenant Governor to serve as his or her running mate in a slate of candidates. After the filing of the certificate or petition of nomination under KRS

118.365

, and not later than 4 p.m. on the second Tuesday in August preceding the regular election for the office of Governor, the candidate shall designate his or her running mate by filing with the Secretary of State the name and address of a person qualified under the Constitution of Kentucky to serve as Lieutenant Governor.

A slate of candidates for Governor and Lieutenant Governor shall be elected jointly at a regular election by the casting by each voter of a single vote applicable to both offices. No candidate for Governor or Lieutenant Governor shall appear individually on the ballot at a regular election for the office he or she is seeking.

HISTORY:

2020 ch. 88, § 1, effective July 15, 2020.

118.127.
Slate of candidates for Governor and Lieutenant Governor. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 288, § 14, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 458, § 19, effective July 15, 1994; repealed by 2020 ch. 88, § 12, effective July 15, 2020.

118.129.
Spelling
and form of candidate’s name on ballot.

The Secretary of State or the county clerk, as appropriate, shall certify the exact spelling and form of the name of the candidate to be printed on all ballots in accordance with the requirements listed in this section.

A candidate’s nickname which is found to be, in the discretion of the Secretary of State or the county clerk, as appropriate, a title, rank, degree, job description, or spurious phrase shall be placed on the ballot only if it is the candidate’s bona fide nickname, generally used by acquaintances of the candidate in the county of residence to refer to the candidate, and if the nickname is acknowledged, by affidavit, under oath, by five (5) residents of the county in which the candidate resides, to be a bona fide nickname. The candidate shall also acknowledge, by affidavit under oath, that this is his bona fide nickname and is not being used to gain an advantage on the ballot.

A nickname shall always appear set off in quotation marks and immediately before the last name. Periods shall follow all abbreviations or initials. Additional qualifiers following the last name, such as “Jr” or “III” shall not be separated from the last name by a comma and shall be followed by a period.

The candidate’s name shall always appear in the following form: first or given name or initial; middle name or names or initials, if desired by the candidate; nickname if desired by the candidate; and last or surname in full. All names shall be in substantially the following form: John Lincoln “Jack” Doe; or J. Lincoln “Jack” Doe; or J. L. “Jack” Doe Jr.; or any of the above combinations without the intervening nickname.

The total number of spaces, inclusive of letters, spaces, and punctuation, which may be utilized on the ballot for a candidate’s name and, if any, nickname, shall be twenty-five (25). Notwithstanding the listing of the candidate’s name on the filing papers, spaces, periods, quotation marks, and commas necessary for proper punctuation shall be added by the Secretary of State or the county clerk, as appropriate. No candidate’s name shall exceed twenty-five (25) spaces. The Secretary of State or the county clerk, as appropriate, shall determine the correct listing for any candidate whose name exceeds twenty-five (25) spaces to conform to this requirement.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 186, § 2, effective November 5, 1992.

118.130.
When
certificates and petitions of nominations to be filed. [Repealed.]

118.135.
Vacancy
before primary, independent to file when. [Repealed.]

118.136.
“Dummy”
candidates prohibited.

No person shall file a notification
and declaration to become a candidate in a primary election as a pretended,
fictitious or “dummy” candidate for the purpose of influencing
or controlling the selection of challengers or inspectors or officers of election,
nor shall any person solicit, persuade, urge, influence or induce another
person to file a notification and declaration with the intention that such
person become a pretended, fictitious or “dummy” candidate for
the purpose of influencing or controlling the selection of challengers or
inspectors or officers of election.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 103.

118.140.
Time
certificates and petitions to be preserved. [Repealed.]

118.145.
Nomination
of candidates for judicial officers. [Repealed.]

118.150.
Secretary
of state to certify names of candidates to county clerks. [Repealed.]

118.155.
Nomination
of candidates serving in Armed Forces.

The provisions of KRS

118.125

shall not apply to any eligible person serving in the Armed Forces of the United States while this country is at war. The name of such person shall be printed on the official ballot of his party for an office for which he is eligible in any primary election when an application has been filed on his behalf by two (2) reputable electors of the party at whose hands he seeks the nomination.

Such application shall be accompanied by a statement signed by the proposed candidate authorizing the action of the electors.

The application and the candidate’s statement, herein mentioned, shall be filed in good faith and with the proper officer at the proper time, as provided for other candidates in primary elections.

The form of such application shall be similar to that of the affidavits required of electors in behalf of other candidates as provided in KRS

118.125

.

Before such a successful candidate is given a certificate of nomination, he shall file with the county clerk of the county in which he resides a statement that during the campaign for the nomination he did not, and while a candidate for the office will not, knowingly violate any election law or any law relating to corrupt and fraudulent practice in campaigns or elections in this state, and if elected will qualify for the office.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 105; 1976, ch. 54, § 25, effective March 10, 1976.

118.160.
Withdrawal
of nomination. [Repealed.]

118.165.
Filing of nomination papers — Certification — Ineligibility of Senior Status Special Judge.

Except as provided in KRS Chapters 116 to 121, candidates for offices to be voted for by the electors of one (1) county or of a district less than one (1) county, except members of Congress and members of the General Assembly, shall file their nomination papers with the county clerk of the county not earlier than the first Wednesday after the first Monday in November of the year preceding the year the office will appear on the ballot and not later than the first Friday following the first Monday in January preceding the day fixed by law for holding the primary.

Candidates for offices to be voted for by the electors of more than one (1) county, and for members of Congress and members of the General Assembly, shall file their nomination papers with the Secretary of State not earlier than the first Wednesday after the first Monday in November of the year preceding the year the office will appear on the ballot and not later than the first Friday following the first Monday in January preceding the day fixed by law for holding the primary. Signatures for nomination papers shall not be affixed on the document to be filed prior to the first Wednesday after the first Monday in November of the year preceding the year in which the office will appear on the ballot. All nomination papers shall be filed no later than 4 p.m. local time at the place of filing when filed on the last date on which the papers may be filed.

The Secretary of State or the county clerk shall examine the notification and declaration form of each candidate to determine whether it is regular on its face. If there is an error, the proper officer shall notify the candidate by certified mail within twenty-four (24) hours of filing.

A judge who elected to retire as a Senior Status Special Judge in accordance with KRS

21.580

shall not become a candidate or a nominee for any elected office during the five (5) year term prescribed in KRS

21.580

(1)(a)1., regardless of the number of days served by the judge acting as a Senior Status Special Judge.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 106; 1976, ch. 7, § 2; 1978, ch. 318, § 6, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 114, § 14, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 394, § 20, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 402, § 4, effective January 1, 1984; 1984, ch. 185, § 10, effective July 13, 1984; 1984, ch. 185, § 11, effective January 1, 1985; 1986, ch. 185, § 1, effective January 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 17, § 10, effective July 15, 1988; 1988, ch. 238, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 48, § 40, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 296, § 8, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 2, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2008, ch. 79, § 11, effective July 15, 2008; 2013, ch. 66, § 3, effective June 25, 2013; 2019 ch. 187, § 2, effective November 6, 2019.

118.170.
Form
of ballot — Party emblems — Method of indicating public questions.
[Repealed.]

118.171.
Name
of candidate to appear but once. [Repealed.]

118.173.
Judicial
ballots, contents, how arranged. [Repealed.]

118.175.
Arrangement
of names on ballots in elections of city officers. [Repealed.]

118.176.
Challenging bona fides of candidate.

A “bona fide” candidate means one who is seeking nomination in a primary or election in a special or regular election according to law.

The bona fides of any candidate seeking nomination as the nominee of a political party or a nonpartisan or judicial nominee in a primary or election to an office as a member of a political organization, political group, or as an independent in a special or regular election may be questioned by any qualified voter entitled to vote for the candidate or by an opposing candidate by summary proceedings consisting of a motion before the Circuit Court of the judicial circuit in which the candidate whose bona fides is questioned resides. An action regarding the bona fides of the nominee of a political party or a nonpartisan or judicial nominee may be commenced at any time prior to the primary. An action regarding the bona fides for election to an office as a member of a political organization, political group, or as an independent may be commenced at any time prior to a special or regular election. The motion shall be tried summarily and without delay. Proof may be heard orally, and upon motion of either party shall be officially reported. If the Circuit Judge of the circuit in which the proceeding is filed is disqualified or absent from the county or is herself or himself a candidate, the proceeding may be presented to, heard and determined by the Circuit Judge of any adjoining judicial circuit.

In any action or proceeding under this section the burden of proof as to the bona fides of a candidate shall be on the person challenging the bona fides of a candidate.

If the court finds the candidate is not a bona fide candidate it shall so order, and certify the fact to the board of elections, and the candidate’s name shall be stricken from the written designation of election officers filed with the board of elections or the court may refuse recognition or relief in a mandatory or injunctive way. The order of the Circuit Court shall be entered on the order book of the court and shall be subject to a motion to set aside in the Court of Appeals. The motion shall be heard by the Court of Appeals or a judge thereof in the manner provided for dissolving or granting injunctions, except that the motion shall be made before the court or judge within five (5) days after the entry of the order in the Circuit Court, and may be heard and tried upon the original papers, and the order of the Court of Appeals or judge thereof shall be final.

No person shall approach the Circuit Judge for the purpose or view of influencing his or her decision on the motion pending before the Circuit Judge or to be tried by him or her.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 107; 1976, ch. 62, § 86; 1976, ch. 247, § 7; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 131, effective January 2, 1978; 1984, ch. 413, § 2, effective April 11, 1984; 2001, ch. 52, § 1, effective June 21, 2001; 2010, ch. 123, § 1, effective July 15, 2010; 2021 ch. 197, § 76, effective June 29, 2021.

118.180.
Paper
on which ballots to be printed. [Repealed.]

118.185.
Certification
of unopposed candidate.

If it appears, after the expiration
of the time for filing nomination papers, that there is only one (1) candidate
who has filed the necessary papers for a place on the ballot of any party
on whose ballot he is entitled to have his name printed, the officer with
whom the papers are filed shall immediately issue and file in his office a
certificate of nomination, and send a copy to the candidate.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 108.

118.190.
When
ballots to be printed — Number to be furnished each precinct. [Repealed.]

118.195.
Inspection
of nomination papers.

All nomination papers filed
under KRS

118.165

and

118.365

shall at all times be subject to inspection
by any person.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 109; 1976, ch. 247, § 13.

118.200.
Method
of filling vacancy in candidacy after ballots are printed. [Repealed.]

118.205.
Register of candidates — Display of information on Web site.

The Secretary of State and the county clerk of each county within this state shall each keep a book titled “Register of Candidates for Nomination in the Primary.” The Secretary of State and each county clerk shall enter on different pages of the book for the different political parties, the title of office sought, the name and residence of each candidate for nomination in the primary, the name of his or her political party, and the date of receiving his or her nomination papers. The book shall be so kept that the names of all candidates of the same political party shall be on the same or successive pages and the names of candidates of no two (2) political parties shall appear on the same page. The books shall be public records.

The county clerk of each county, within five (5) business days following the date of receiving a candidate’s nomination papers, shall:

Transmit a candidate’s information derived from subsection (1) of this section to the Secretary of State; and

Prominently display a candidate’s information derived from subsection (1) of this section on the clerk’s official Web site.

The Secretary of State shall prominently display a candidate’s information, derived from subsection (1) of this section, on the Secretary of State’s official Web site within five (5) business days following the date of receiving a candidate’s nomination papers or within five (5) days following the receipt of a candidate’s information supplied by the county clerk, whichever is applicable. The information displayed shall be derived from the Secretary’s book and from each book held by the county clerk of each county within this state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 110; 1978, ch. 384, § 253, effective June 17, 1978; 2022 ch. 219, § 8, effective July 14, 2022.

118.210.
Preparation
of seals, envelopes, stencils and other election supplies — Delivery
of ballots and supplies to precincts. [Repealed.]

118.212.
When
candidate’s name not to be certified or printed on ballot — Effect of
death or withdrawal of candidate — Notice required at polls —
Penalty.

If, before the time of certification of candidates who will appear on the ballot provided in KRS

118.215

, any candidate whose notification and declaration or certificate or petition of nomination has been filed in the office of the Secretary of State dies or notifies the Secretary of State in writing, signed and properly notarized that he will not accept the nomination or election, the Secretary of State shall not certify his name.

If, after the certification of candidates who will appear on the ballot, any candidate whose notification and declaration or certificate or petition of nomination has been filed in the office of the county clerk dies or notifies the clerk, in the manner described in subsection (1) of this section, that he will not accept the nomination or election, the clerk shall ensure that notice is provided to the appropriate precincts as provided in subsection (5) of this section.

If, after the certification of candidates who will appear on the ballot, any candidate whose notification and declaration or certificate or petition of nomination has been filed in the office of the Secretary of State dies or notifies the Secretary of State in the manner described in subsection (1) of this section, that he will not accept the nomination or election, the Secretary of State shall immediately notify the appropriate county clerk, and the clerk shall ensure that notice is provided to the appropriate precincts as provided in subsection (5) of this section.

If, after the certification of candidates who will appear on the ballot, any candidate whose name appears on the ballot shall officially withdraw or die, neither the precinct election officers nor the county board of elections shall tabulate or record the votes cast for the candidate; and, if there is only one (1) remaining candidate on the ballot for that office in a primary election, following the withdrawal or death of the other candidate or candidates, neither the precinct election officers nor the county board of elections shall tabulate or record the votes for the remaining candidate, and the officer with whom the remaining candidate has filed his or her nomination papers shall immediately issue and file in his or her office a certificate of nomination for that remaining candidate and send a copy to the remaining candidate.

If, after the certification of candidates who will appear on the ballot, any candidate whose name appears on the ballot shall officially withdraw or die, the county clerk shall provide a notice to the precinct election officers who shall see that the notice is conspicuously displayed at the polling place advising voters of the change, and that votes for the candidate shall not be tabulated or recorded. If the county clerk learns of the death or withdrawal at least five (5) days prior to the election and provides the notice required by this subsection and the precinct officers fail to post the notice at the polling place, the precinct officers shall be guilty of a violation subject to a fine of not less than ten dollars ($10) nor more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 247, § 8; 1984, ch. 185, § 12, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 470, § 24, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 48, § 41, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 2, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 2003, ch. 101, § 1, effective June 24, 2003.

118.215.
Certification of candidates or slates by Secretary of State — Order of listing county offices — Use of supplemental paper ballots — Approval of State Board of Elections — Ballot position unalterable.

After the order of the names has been determined as provided in KRS

118.225

, the Secretary of State shall certify, to the county clerks of the respective counties entitled to participate in the nomination or election of the respective candidates, the name, place of residence, and party of each candidate or slate of candidates for each office, as specified in the nomination papers or certificates and petitions of nomination filed with him or her, and shall designate the device with which the candidate groups, slates of candidates, or lists of candidates of each party shall be printed, in the order in which they are to appear on the ballot, with precedence to be given to the party that polled the highest number of votes at the preceding election for presidential electors, followed by the political party which received the second highest number of votes, with the order of any other political parties and independents to be determined by lot. Candidates for county offices and local state offices shall be listed in the following order: Commonwealth’s attorney, circuit clerk, property valuation administrator, county judge/executive, county attorney, county clerk, sheriff, jailer, county commissioner, coroner, justice of the peace, and constable. The names of candidates for President and Vice President shall be certified in lieu of certifying the names of the candidates for presidential electors. The names shall be certified as follows:

Not later than the second Monday after the filing deadline for the primary as established in KRS

83A.045

,

118.165

, and

118A.060

;

Not later than the fourth Monday in August, except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection; and

Not later than the Monday after the Friday following the first Tuesday in September preceding a regular election, for those years in which there is an election for President and Vice President of the United States.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, all independent candidates or slates of candidates whose nominating petitions are filed with the county clerk or the Secretary of State shall be listed under the title and device designated by them as provided in KRS

118.315

, or if none is designated, under the word “independent,” and shall be placed on the ballot in a separate column or columns or in a separate line or lines according to the office which they seek. The order in which independent candidates or slates of candidates shall appear on the ballot shall be determined by lot by the county clerk. If the same device is selected by two (2) groups of petitioners, it shall be given to the first selecting it and the county clerk shall permit the other group to select a suitable device. This section shall not apply to candidates for municipal offices which come under subsection (3) of this section.

The ballots used at any election in which city officers are to be elected as provided in subsection (2) of this section shall contain the names of candidates for the city offices grouped according to the offices they seek, and the candidates shall be immediately arranged with and designated by the title of office they seek. The order in which the names of the candidates for each office are to be printed on the ballot shall be determined by lot. Each group of candidates for each separate office for which the candidates are to be elected shall be clearly separated from other groups on the ballot and spaced to avoid confusion on the part of the voter.

The Secretary of State shall not knowingly certify to the county clerk of any county the name of any candidate or slate of candidates who has not filed the required nomination papers, nor knowingly fail to certify the name of any candidate or slate of candidates who has filed the required nomination papers.

If the county clerk determines that the number of certified candidates or slates of candidates cannot be placed on a ballot which can be accommodated by the voting equipment currently in use by the county, he or she shall so notify the State Board of Elections not later than the last Tuesday in February preceding the primary or the last Tuesday in August preceding the regular election. The State Board of Elections shall meet within five (5) days of the notice, review the ballot conditions, and determine whether supplemental paper ballots are necessary for the election. Upon approval of the State Board of Elections, supplemental paper ballots may be used for nonpartisan candidates or slates of candidates for an office or offices and public questions submitted for a yes or no vote. All candidates or slates of candidates for any particular office shall be placed either on the ballot or on the supplemental paper ballot. Supplemental paper ballots may also be used to conduct the voting, in the instance of a small precinct as provided in KRS

117.066

.

The ballot position of a candidate or slate of candidates shall not be changed after the ballot position has been designated by the county clerk.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 111; 1976, ch. 199, § 2; 1976, ch. 247, § 9; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 2; 1982, ch. 394, § 21, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 185, § 13, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 470, § 25, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 48, § 42, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 169, § 7, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 288, § 39, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 296, § 9, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 195, § 14, effective July 15, 1996; 2002, ch. 129, § 4, effective April 2, 2002; 2007, ch. 133, § 2, effective April 5, 2007; 2008, ch. 129, § 8, effective July 15, 2008; 2018 ch. 162, § 3, effective November 7, 2018; 2019 ch. 187, § 4, effective November 6, 2019; 2021 ch. 197, § 50, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 87, § 19, effective April 7, 2022.

118.220.
Instruction
cards. [Repealed.]

118.225.
Determination of order of names on ballot.

For the purpose of determining the order in which the names of candidates or slates of candidates to be voted for by the electors of the entire state shall be certified and printed on the ballots with the designation of the respective offices, the Secretary of State shall prepare lists of the counties of each congressional district of the state. The Secretary of State shall arrange the surnames of all candidates or slates of candidates for each office in alphabetical order for the First Congressional District, and the names shall be certified in this order to the county clerks of all the counties comprising that district. For each succeeding congressional district, taken in numerical order, the name appearing first for each office in the last preceding district shall be placed last, and the name appearing second in the last preceding district shall be placed first, and each other name shall be moved up one (1) place. The lists shall be certified accordingly.

For all other offices for which nomination papers and petitions are filed with the Secretary of State, the order of names of candidates for each office shall be determined by lot at a public drawing to be held in the office of the Secretary of State at 2 p.m., standard time, on the Thursday following the filing deadline for the primary as established in KRS

83A.045

,

118.165

, and

118A.060

or the Thursday following the first Tuesday after the first Monday in June preceding the regular election.

For all offices for which nomination papers and petitions are filed in the office of the county clerk, the order in which the names of candidates for each office are to be printed on the ballot shall be determined by lot at a public drawing in the office of the county clerk at 2 p.m., standard time, on the Thursday following the filing deadline for the primary as established in KRS

83A.045

,

118.165

, and

118A.060

or the Thursday following the first Tuesday after the first Monday in June preceding the regular election.

For all offices for which the deadline for filing nomination papers and petitions is governed by KRS 83A.165(4)(c) or 118.375(2), the order in which the names of candidates for each office are to be printed shall be determined by lot at a public drawing in the office at the place of filing at 2 p.m., standard time, on the Thursday following the second Tuesday in August preceding the regular election.

If the number of certified candidates or slates of candidates cannot be placed on a ballot which can be accommodated on voting equipment currently in use in the county, the county clerk shall notify the State Board of Elections, as provided in KRS

118.215

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 112; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 10; 1982, ch. 394, § 22, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 185, § 14, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 470, § 26, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 48, § 43, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 288, § 40, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 296, § 10, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 195, § 15, effective July 15, 1996; 2008, ch. 129, § 9, effective July 15, 2008; 2018 ch. 162, § 4, effective November 7, 2018; 2019 ch. 187, § 5, effective November 6, 2019; 2021 ch. 197, § 51, effective June 29, 2021.